Hawaii statutes.
[§432G-15] Administrative fines and
enforcement. (a) The commissioner, in addition to or in lieu of
suspension or revocation of a certificate of authority pursuant to section 432G‑13,
may levy an administrative fine upon a dental insurer in an amount not less
than $500 and not more than $50,000. The dental insurer may request, in
writing, a hearing pursuant to section 432G‑13. The order levying the
fine shall specify the period within which the fine shall be fully paid, which
shall not be less than thirty nor more than forty-five days from the date of
the order. Upon failure to pay the fine when due, the commissioner shall
revoke the insurer's certificate of authority if not already revoked, and the
fine shall be recovered in a civil action brought on behalf of the
commissioner. Any fine so collected shall be remitted by the commissioner to
the director of finance and shall be placed to the credit of the compliance
resolution fund.

(b) If the commissioner, for any reason, has
cause to believe that any violation of this chapter has occurred or is
threatened, the commissioner may give notice to a dental insurer and its
representatives, or other persons who appear to be involved in such suspected
violation, to arrange a conference with the alleged violators or their
authorized representatives for the purpose of attempting to ascertain the facts
relating to any suspected violation. In the event it appears that any
violation has occurred or is threatened, the commissioner may attempt to arrive
at an adequate and effective means of correcting or preventing the violation.
Proceedings under this subsection shall not be governed by any formal
procedural requirements and may be conducted in such manner as the commissioner
may deem appropriate under the circumstances. However, unless consented to by
the dental insurer, no order may result from a conference until the
requirements of this section are satisfied.

(c) The commissioner may issue an order
directing a dental insurer or a representative of a dental insurer to cease and
desist from engaging in any act or practice in violation of the provisions of
this chapter. Any person aggrieved by an order of the commissioner under this
section may obtain judicial review of the order in the manner provided for by
chapter 91.

(d) In the case of any violation of the
provisions of this chapter, if the commissioner elects not to issue a cease and
desist order, or in the event of noncompliance with a cease and desist order
issued pursuant to subsection (c), the commissioner may institute a proceeding
to obtain injunctive or other appropriate relief in any court of competent
jurisdiction. [L 2013, c 191, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next